District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.18

Rules.

(a)

The Director, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The rules may establish fees as may be necessary or useful for implementation of the subchapter, including permit application fees, fees for the use of public space, and fees for services provided by DDOT or rights or privileges granted by DDOT.

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 9j
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-207, § 2(c), 61 DCR 12690

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-207: Section 12(a) of D.C. Law 20-207 provided that §§ 2(a), 2(b)(1), 2(b)(2)(A), 2(b)(2)(B), 2(b)(2)(C), 2(c), 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 11 shall apply as of March 11, 2015.